Utah statutes.
10-3-912.   Chief of department may suspend subordinates.
(1)  The chief of each department may at any time suspend any subordinate
officers, members, employees, or agents employed therein when in his judgment
the good of the service demands it, and during the time of suspension, the
person suspended shall not be entitled to any salary or compensation
whatsoever.
(2)  Any suspension of employees in the classified civil service which exceeds
three days or 24 working hours is subject to an appeal to the civil service
commission as provided in Section 10-3-1012.
